Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑36] Stocks and bonds.
Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of
attorney granting general authority with respect to stocks and bonds shall
authorize the agent to:

(1) Buy, sell, and exchange stocks and bonds;

(2) Establish, continue, modify, or terminate an
account with respect to stocks and bonds;

(3) Pledge stocks and bonds as security to borrow,
pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal;

(4) Receive certificates and other evidences of
ownership with respect to stocks and bonds; and

(5) Exercise voting rights with respect to stocks and
bonds in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to
limitations on the right to vote. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next